Wisconsin, session 2025, AB347.
do enact as follows:AB347,11Section 1. 59.365 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB347,2,11259.365 (3) (a) Notwithstanding subs. (1) (a) and (b) and (2), if a board that had 3been providing coroner or lay medical examiner services begins providing physician 4medical examiner services under an intergovernmental cooperation agreement 5under s. 66.0301 after December 31, 2015, and before April 1, 2016 after December 61, 2024, and before July 1, 2025, the board may one time set the fee assessed for the 7signing of a death record at an amount exceeding the amount that was in effect on 8April 17, 2015, by not more than $100 and may one time set the fee assessed for the 9issuance of a cremation permit at an amount exceeding the amount that was in 10effect on April 17, 2015, by not more than $100. Fees under this paragraph may be 11established without regard to any change in the U.S. consumer price index.AB347,2,1212